Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.230

Employer reports to department.

On or before a date specified by the department in each month every employer shall file a report with the department on a form provided, stating the name of the employer and with respect to each employee who is a member or who is required to become a member of the Washington state teachers' retirement system: (1) The full name, (2) the earnable compensation paid, (3) the employee's contribution to the retirement system, and (4) other information as the department shall require.

[ 1991 c 35 s 51; 1983 c 56 s 14; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 16 s 1. Prior: 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 150; 1975 c 43 s 32; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 96; 1967 c 50 s 4; 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 13; 1947 c 80 s 42; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-61. Formerly RCW 41.32.420.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Severability—1983 c 56: See note following RCW 28A.195.010.

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 176: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Effective date—Severability—1967 c 50: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Savings—Severability—Effective date—1963 ex.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.